Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 19. Wyoming Indian Affairs Council

§ 9-2-1901.
Short title. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 281, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-1701

; repealed by 2022 ch. 82, § 5, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 9-2-1902.
Definitions. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 281, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-1702

; repealed by 2022 ch. 82, § 5, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 9-2-1903.
Council created; membership; meetings; expenses. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 281, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-1703

; repealed by 2022 ch. 82, § 5, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 9-2-1904.
Council powers and duties. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 281, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-1704

; repealed by 2022 ch. 82, § 5, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 9-2-1905.
Legal services; government agency cooperation. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 281, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-1705

; repealed by 2022 ch. 82, § 5, effective July 1, 2022.